Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 56

Procurement

4-56-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the state procurement commission, which replaces the board of standards within former title 12, chapter 3, part 4;

“Committee” means the state protest committee, which replaces the board of standards protest authority within former § 12-3-214 [repealed] and the review committee within former § 12-4-109(a)(1)(E) [repealed];

“Council” means the advisory council on state procurement;

“Goods” means all property, including, but not limited to, supplies, equipment, materials, printing, and insurance. “Goods” does not include leases, acquisitions, and disposals of real property, which are governed under chapter 15 of this title;

“Grant” means any grant awarded to the state or awarded by the state for the furnishing by the state of assistance, whether financial or otherwise, to any person to support a program authorized by law. “Grant” does not include an award with the primary purpose of procuring an end product, whether in the form of supplies, services, or construction, or any contract resulting from such an award;

“Procurement” means buying, purchasing, renting, leasing, or otherwise acquiring any goods or services. It also includes all functions that pertain to the obtaining of any goods or service, including the description of requirements, selection and solicitation of sources, preparation and award of a contract, and all phases of contract administration;

“Proposer” includes a “bidder” or “proposer” that is a legal entity that has properly registered as required by the state. The terms “bidder” and “proposer” may be used interchangeably for the term “proposer”;

“Services” means all services and agreements obligating the state, except services for highway and road improvements, which are governed by title 54, and designer and construction services, which are governed under chapter 15 of this title; and

“Vendor” means a legal entity that has been established by the department of finance and administration's division of accounts as a vendor through proper authority for which payment may be made by the state.

Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§12-3-214 and12-4-109(a)(1)(E), referred to in this section, were repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 295, §§ 10 and 13, respectively, effective April 1, 2012.

Acts 2010, 1098, § 1, purported to enact this section effective October 1, 2011. Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 1 deleted the section effective May 27, 2011, and enacted this section instead, effective April 1, 2012.

Attorney General Opinions. Comptroller's service on proposed state procurement commission. OAG 10-63, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 68 (5/5/10).

Applicability of procurement requirements when providing grants and entering into agreements to assist impaired professionals pursuant to T.C.A. §63-1-136; applicability to grant contracts for peer assistance issued by health-related regulatory boards under T.C.A. §63-1-136. OAG 14-98, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 101 (10/30/14).

4-56-102. Procurement commission — Creation.

There is created a procurement commission, which shall consist of the commissioners of general services and finance and administration, and the comptroller of the treasury. The chief procurement officer shall serve as a nonvoting member.

The commission shall adopt a procedure governing its proceedings, and the chief procurement officer shall keep a permanent and accurate record of all of its proceedings.

All departments and agencies shall submit existing rules related to procurement to the commission for the commission's review, comment, and recommendations for any changes to such rules. Prior to forwarding draft rules related to procurement to the secretary of state, all departments shall submit such draft rules to the commission for the commission's review and comment together with any recommendations for changes to such draft rules.

The attorney general and reporter shall serve as legal counsel to the commission in accordance with the requirements of § 8-6-301.

The commission has the power and authority, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, to review, comment, and approve draft rules and regulations, policies, standards, and procedures to be followed consistent with this chapter and title 12, chapters 3 and 4, and to make recommendations for changes thereto, governing the procurement of goods and services, contracting, agency contract and grant management, training and professional development, and the disposal of goods and services by the state.

The commission is authorized to promulgate necessary rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title, as well as policies and procedures to implement this chapter.

The commission shall not exercise authority over the award or administration of any particular contract or grant.

Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 2; 2013, ch. 403, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The state procurement commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

Acts 2010, 1098, § 1, purported to enact this section effective October 1, 2011. Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 2 deleted the section effective May 27, 2011, and enacted this section instead, effective April 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which amended subdivisions (a)(2) and (b)(1), shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

4-56-103. Proposed rules related to procurement — State protest committee — Creation — Commission's authority — Appeals.

Creation of Committee.

There is created a state protest committee, which shall consist of the commissioners of general services and finance and administration, and the treasurer.

The committee shall adopt procedures governing its operations, and the chief procurement officer shall keep a permanent and accurate record of all of its proceedings.

If a member is not available to hear a scheduled protest, the member is authorized to appoint a designee to hear the scheduled protest on the member's behalf.

Appeals to Committee.

The committee is authorized to act on any appeal of the chief procurement officer's decision of a protest.

Any committee member whose department is the requestor of a procurement or the resulting contract may not hear the protest.

The chief procurement officer shall provide the minutes of the protest proceedings to each committee member and to the comptroller of the treasury and shall post the final determination within fifteen (15) business days to the single public procurement website.

Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 3; 2013, ch. 403, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, 1098, § 1, purported to enact this section effective October 1, 2011. Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 3 deleted the section effective May 27, 2011, and enacted this section instead, effective April 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

The state protest committee, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

4-56-104. Procurement office — Creation — Chief procurement officer — Personnel — Contracts and contract rights and responsibilities — Adoption of operational procedures.

There is created a procurement office headed by the chief procurement officer in such department as the governor shall designate, after consulting with the comptroller of the treasury, which shall take effect as provided in subsection (b).

Effective July 1, 2011, the governor shall appoint the chief procurement officer, who shall be a person:

Qualified by training and relevant and recent experience in large scale public procurement of goods and services, establishment of contracts, contract oversight, providing training and contract administration, and demonstrated executive and organizational ability to perform the duties of this office; and

Qualified by training or relevant and recent experience in administering programs to encourage and enhance economic opportunities for small businesses and minority-owned businesses.

The chief procurement officer shall be a full-time public official of the state as an executive service employee appointed by the governor to serve at the pleasure of the governor.

Necessary personnel in the department of general services involved in the procurement of goods and necessary personnel in the department of finance and administration involved in the procurement of services, as required by the procurement officer, shall be transferred to the procurement office together with the funding for the compensation and benefits for such personnel.

The chief procurement officer is authorized to employ such additional personnel as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, upon the approval of the governor.

The compensation of employees of the procurement office shall be fixed by the governor.

All contracts and contract rights and responsibilities, and renewals for such contracts, in existence with the department of general services and the department of finance and administration with respect to the duties transferred by this section shall be preserved and transferred to the procurement office.

Any bidding procedure or negotiations concerning any such procedure which is in the process but not complete shall continue under the purview of the procurement officer.

All documents, books, records, papers or other writings in the possession of the department of general services and the department of finance and administration with respect to the duties transferred by this section shall be transferred to and remain in the custody of the procurement office.

Any rules, regulations, orders, decisions and policies formerly issued or promulgated by the departments of finance and administration or general services whose functions have been transferred under this section to the procurement office shall remain in full force and effect and shall hereafter be administered and enforced by the procurement officer. The commission shall have the authority, consistent with the statutes and regulations pertaining to the programs and functions transferred herein, to modify or rescind orders, rules and regulations, decisions or policies formerly issued and to adopt, issue or promulgate new orders, rules and regulations, decisions or policies as may be necessary for the administration of the programs or functions herein transferred.

Subject to this chapter and other procurement laws under the jurisdiction of the chief procurement office, the chief procurement officer may adopt operational procedures governing the internal functions of the procurement office.

Acts 2010, ch. 1098, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 6; 2012, ch. 537, §§ 1-4; 2013, ch. 403, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

4-56-105. Powers and duties of chief procurement officer.

The chief procurement officer has the power and duty to:

Effective January 1, 2012, establish a single, public procurement website that includes how to do business with the state; registration for bidders; posting of all procurements in process and related status to award; and a database of established contracts by state agencies, departments and institutions;

Effective April 1, 2012, develop a transition plan that provides for the implementation by date and action to consolidate the procurement and contracting for goods, services and grants; to include employee job classifications for the state procurement office and agency procurement functions that include development and training plans and other plans as prescribed and approved by the commission;

Develop and propose to the general assembly any changes required to consolidate statutes;

Develop proposed rules and regulations, policies, standards and procedures consistent with this chapter and title 12, chapters 3 and 4 and approved by the commission that establish:

A central procurement process with opportunities for strategic sourcing;

A central contract management process;

A central grant management process that will assist agencies in identifying grant opportunities and provide for a central database of information regarding grant recipients and sub-recipients for monitoring purposes;

A central performance and quality assurance process that assists agencies in identifying risk areas and recommending contract performance and management best practices; and

A central bidder relations management process to include a central bidder registration database and program for conducting business with the state, which provides bidders and vendors with training and assistance with technical matters, procurement notification, and contract and grant awards;

Develop and conduct training to foster professional development and certification for the state procurement office and agency procurement staff to promote procurement excellence, either independently or in cooperation with other state governments, municipalities or other units of local government, or other persons. In conducting this training, the chief procurement officer shall:

Prescribe professional and accountability standards and guidelines for procurement, contract, grant, performance and quality assurance management personnel;

Conduct or participate in procurement education and training programs;

Conduct research into existing and new methods of procurement; and

Establish and maintain an electronic library of education and training courses and technical reference resources;

Delegate authority to designees or to any department, agency, or official, subject to additional approvals including approval by the comptroller of the treasury and such other requirements as prescribed in rules, regulations, standards, policies and procedures approved by the commission;

Establish and maintain agenda and minutes of the commission and the council and all actions of both, which shall be open to public inspection during regular office hours and on the single public procurement website in accordance with bylaws established by the council and commission. The chief procurement officer shall chair the council. Except as otherwise indicated, all requirements of this section shall be ready for implementation by the chief procurement officer by April 1, 2012;

Prescribe the manner in which goods and services shall be purchased, delivered, stored and distributed;

Require periodic reports by departments, institutions and agencies of state government of stocks of supplies, materials, and equipment on hand and prescribe the form of such reports;

Prescribe the dates for making requisitions and estimates, the periods for which they are to be made and the manner of authentication;

Prescribe the manner of inspecting all deliveries of supplies, materials, and equipment and of making chemical and physical tests of samples submitted with solicitation responses, and sample deliveries to determine whether deliveries have been made to departments, institutions, and agencies in compliance with specifications;

Prescribe the manner for the handling and processing of specifications, estimates, requisitions, solicitations, responses to solicitations, and all reports made and required to be made to the department;

Prescribe the manner in which respondents may qualify and show responsibility in compliance;

Prescribe the manner for responding to solicitations on lease-purchase contracts and multi-year contracts for the rental of personal property;

Prescribe the manner that provides for and regulates the advertisement, soliciting, and letting of state contracts that include escalator clauses;

Resolve controversies concerning protests of qualification of respondents, suspension from competing, solicitations, and stay of award prior to actual award;

Prescribe the manner for conducting discussions and negotiations, particularly with respect to participants and safeguarding of information, for all solicitation types;

Prescribe the process to be followed in making data available to respondents of solicitations;

Prescribe the process to be followed by agencies in requisitioning goods or services through the central procurement office; and

Provide for any other matters that may be necessary to give effect to the powers and duties of the chief procurement officer under this section by rules and regulations, standards, policies and procedures approved by the commission.

Acts 2010, ch. 1098, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 7, 8; 2012, ch. 537, §§ 5, 6; 2012, ch. 626, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 403, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of procurement requirements when providing grants and entering into agreements to assist impaired professionals pursuant to T.C.A. §63-1-136; applicability to grant contracts for peer assistance issued by health-related regulatory boards under T.C.A. §63-1-136. OAG 14-98, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 101 (10/30/14).

4-56-106. Advisory council on state procurement — Creation.

Effective November 1, 2011, there is created an advisory council on state procurement. There shall be five (5) voting members of the council. There shall be seven (7) nonvoting members of the council representing the proposer and vendor community and other procurement professionals. All members shall have a demonstrable working knowledge of the state procurement process. In making the appointments to the advisory council, the appointing authorities shall give due consideration to the need for geographic, age, racial, gender, and ethnic diversity on the council.

The five (5) voting members of the council shall consist of one (1) representative of state agencies appointed by the commissioner of general services, one (1) representative from the department of general services to be appointed by the commissioner of general services, one (1) representative from the department of finance and administration to be appointed by the commissioner of finance and administration, one (1) representative from the office of the comptroller of the treasury to be appointed by the comptroller of the treasury, and the chief procurement officer who shall serve as chair. The initial appointments by the commissioners shall be made prior to November 1, 2011. The initial appointment by the comptroller of the treasury shall be made prior to November 1, 2011. Any vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term by the appointing authority making the initial appointment. The pattern established for initial appointments shall be followed for appointments by the appropriate officials when appointments are to fill expired terms.

Voting members appointed by the commissioner of general services shall serve a staggered four-year term, beginning November 1, 2011. These voting members of the council shall, upon expiration of the member's term, be eligible for reappointment and shall serve until a successor is appointed.

The terms shall be staggered so that the terms of only two (2) voting members shall terminate at the same time.

The term of one (1) voting member initially appointed by the commissioner of general services and the voting member appointed by the commissioner of finance and administration shall be for a two-year term to begin on November 1, 2011, to expire on October 31, 2013, and the successors shall serve a four-year term to begin on November 1, and expire October 31 of the appropriate year.

The term of the other voting member initially appointed by the commissioner of general services shall be for a three-year term to begin on November 1, 2011, to expire on October 31, 2014, and the successor shall serve a four-year term to begin on November 1, and expire October 31 of the appropriate year.

The chief procurement officer shall be an ex officio member whose term shall begin November 1, 2011.

The one (1) voting member appointed by the comptroller of the treasury shall be appointed for a four-year term to begin on November 1, 2011, to expire on October 31, 2015. The successor shall serve a four-year term to begin on November 1, and expire October 31 of the appropriate year.

Proxy voting is prohibited by voting members of the council; provided, however, that, in instances where a voting member will be absent from a vote of the council, the member's appointing authority is authorized to appoint an alternate or designee for the vote.

Any voting member who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year is removed as a member of the council.

The presiding officer of the council shall promptly notify, or cause to be notified, the appointing authority of any voting member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as prescribed in subdivision (b)(4)(A).

Except as provided in subsections (a) and (b), the seven (7) nonvoting members shall be selected to serve staggered four-year terms as follows:

The speaker of the house of representatives, the speaker of the senate, and the governor shall each appoint two (2) representatives, with one (1) representative from the bidder or vendor community and one (1) representative recommended by the National Institute of Government Purchasing. The final advisory nonvoting member appointment shall be appointed by the chair of the fiscal review committee. The initial appointments to the council shall be made prior to November 1, 2011, by the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives. The pattern established for initial appointments shall be followed for appointments by the appropriate officials when appointments are to fill expired terms;

The nonvoting member appointed by the chair of the fiscal review committee shall serve a two-year term, beginning November 1, 2011, until the term expires October 31, 2013. The nonvoting member appointed by the chair of fiscal review shall be eligible for reappointment to succeeding two-year terms without limitation; the two-year term of office of successor appointees shall begin November 1, and expire October 31 of the appropriate year; and

The initial appointments of the nonvoting members shall be staggered. The speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall each initially appoint one (1) member for a two-year term to begin November 1, 2011, and expire October 31, 2013, and one (1) member for a three-year term to begin November 1, 2011, and expire October 31, 2014; and the governor shall initially appoint one (1) member for a two-year term to begin November 1, 2011, and expire October 31, 2013, and one (1) member for a three-year term to begin November 1, 2011, and expire October 31, 2014. All subsequent appointments shall be for a four-year term to begin November 1, and expire October 31 of the appropriate year.

Except as provided in subdivision (c)(1)(B), each nonvoting member of the council, upon expiration of the member's term, shall not be eligible for reappointment for two (2) years after the conclusion of that member's term. In no event shall a nonvoting member of the council serve more than four (4) consecutive years as a nonvoting member of the council. In the event a member resigns or becomes ineligible for service during the member's term, a successor shall be appointed by the appropriate appointing authority to serve the remainder of the term.

No employer shall discriminate in any manner against an employee who serves on the council because of the employee's service on the council. Employees who serve on the council shall not be denied any benefit from their employer because of the employee's service on the council.

Members of the council shall not be paid but may be reimbursed for travel expenses. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The council shall meet at least twice each year for the discussion of problems and recommendations for improvement of the procurement process or any other matter relevant to procurement as determined by the chief procurement officer.

The council shall review and issue a formal comment approved by the council on procurement policies, standards, guidelines, and procedures established by the chief procurement officer prior to being presented for approval by the commission. All reviews and formal comments shall be issued within sixty (60) days of being presented to the council by the chief procurement officer. The formal comments approved by the council shall be provided to the members of the commission, and the officers of the fiscal review committee.

When requested by the chief procurement officer, the council may conduct studies, research, analyses, and make reports and recommendations with respect to subjects or matters within the authority and duties of the chief procurement officer. The chief procurement officer may appoint advisory groups to assist in specific areas, and with respect to any other matters within the authority of the chief procurement officer.

In performing its responsibilities, the council's role shall be strictly advisory, but it may do any of the following:

Make recommendations to the governor, general assembly, fiscal review committee, commissioner of general services, commissioner of finance and administration, and comptroller of the treasury relating to the enactment or promulgation of laws or rules that affect this title and title 12, chapters 3 and 4;

Make recommendations to the commissioner of general services and commissioner of finance and administration regarding the method and form of statistical data collections; and

Monitor the performance of the chief procurement office in the implementation of legislative directives.

The council may develop evaluations, statistical reports, and other information from which the general assembly may evaluate the impact of legislative changes to procurement laws.

Whenever any bill is introduced in the general assembly proposing to amend this chapter, to make any change in public procurement or contract law, or to make any change in the law that may have a financial or other substantive impact on the administration of public procurement and contract law, the standing committee to which the bill is referred may refer the bill to the council. The council's review of bills relating to procurement and contract law shall include, but not be limited to, bills that propose to amend this chapter and title 12, chapters 3 and 4. All bills referred to the council shall be reported back to the standing committee to which they were assigned in a reasonable time. Notwithstanding the absence of a report from the council, the standing committee may consider the bill at any time. The chair making the referral shall immediately notify the prime sponsors of the bill of the referral and the council shall not review and comment on the proposed legislation until the prime sponsors of the bill have been notified. The comments of the council shall describe the potential effects of the proposed legislation on the procurement and contract process and its operations and any other information or suggestions that the council may determine to be helpful for the sponsors, standing committees, or the general assembly. The comments of the council may include recommendations concerning the proposed legislation. Except for reporting the recommendations for or against passage of proposed bill and responding to any inquiries made by the members of the general assembly, council staff shall not lobby or advocate for or against passage of any proposed legislation.

Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 4; 2012, ch. 537, § 7; 2013, ch. 403, § 5; 2020, ch. 671, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, 1098, § 1, purported to enact this section effective October 1, 2011. Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 4 deleted the section effective May 27, 2011, and enacted this section instead, effective November 1, 2011.

Acts 2010, ch. 1098, § 4 purported to transfer §12-4-109(a)(1)(G)-(J) to this section, effective October 1, 2011; however, Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 21 deleted Acts 2010, ch. 1098, § 4, effective May 27, 2011, and Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 22 deleted §12-4-109(a)(1)(G)-(J), effective April 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

The advisory council on state procurement, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

4-56-107. Requests for noncompetitive contracts to fiscal review committee — Review by the fiscal review committee — Exceptions to requests — Reports.

All requests of the procuring agency to procure goods or services by negotiation with a single service provider, referred to in this section as a noncompetitive contract, shall be contemporaneously filed with the fiscal review committee of the general assembly, comptroller of the treasury and the chief procurement officer. Such requests shall document the following:

Description of the goods or services to be acquired;

Explanation of the need for or requirement to acquire the goods or services;

Name and address of the proposed contractor's principal owner;

Evidence that the proposed contractor has experience in providing the same or similar goods or services and evidence of the length of time the contractor has provided the same or similar goods or services;

Explanation of whether the goods or services were purchased by the procuring agency in the past, and if applicable, the method used to purchase the goods or services and the name and address of the contractor;

Description of the procuring agency's efforts to use existing state employees and resources, or in the alternative, to identify reasonable and competitive procurement alternatives, rather than to use noncompetitive negotiation;

Justification of why the goods or services should be acquired through noncompetitive negotiation; and

Any additional information that the fiscal review committee may direct the procuring agency to provide that will assist the committee in evaluating the contract.

The following contracts and contract amendments shall be subject to review by the fiscal review committee:

Proposed noncompetitive contracts with a term of more than one (1) year or which contain a provision to allow for extension by either party that would extend the contract beyond twelve (12) months and which have a cumulative value of not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), including all possible extensions; and

Any amendment to a contract meeting the term and dollar threshold requirements as described in subdivision (b)(1)(A), regardless of whether the original contract was procured through competitive or noncompetitive means, where the amendment:

Increases or decreases the maximum liability;

Extends or shortens the contract term;

Changes the entity or name of the entity with which the state is contracting; or

Otherwise changes an original contract or amended contract in a substantive manner.

If the chief procurement officer or delegated state agency is unable to determine whether a proposed contract or amendment would be subject to review by the fiscal review committee, the chief procurement officer or delegated state agency shall contact the fiscal review committee staff for a determination.

The contracts subject to review shall include all contracts of the executive branch that otherwise meet the requirements of subdivision (b)(1), including, but not limited to, contracts of higher education, including the board of regents, the University of Tennessee, and the Tennessee higher education commission. Highway and road improvement contracts reviewed by the department of transportation, contracts reviewed by the state building commission and debt issuance contracts reviewed by the comptroller of the treasury shall not be subject to this review.

The fiscal review committee, pursuant to its jurisdiction under § 3-7-103(a), is authorized to review any other state contract or contract amendment in accordance with the procedures established in this section without regard to whether the contract or contract amendment meets the requirements of subdivision (b)(1).

The fiscal review committee shall have forty (40) business days from receipt of the request as provided in this section to comment on the proposed contract. After this forty-day period, any such contract authorized by the chief procurement officer may be executed. All other requests to negotiate noncompetitive contracts shall be reviewed by the fiscal review committee after approval by the chief procurement officer. With respect to such requests, the fiscal review committee shall be provided the same information to be submitted in accordance with subsection (a). The chair or the chair's designee, after consultation with the comptroller of the treasury, shall have authority to waive the forty-day period for comment and authorize the chief procurement officer to execute contracts or amendments that are determined to be in the best interest of the state, and to proceed with reporting and comment by the committee at their next scheduled meeting.

If an exception is granted to any request, approved in accordance with subdivision (a)(1) or rules promulgated pursuant to § 4-56-103, then any such exception shall be filed with the fiscal review committee for its perusal, comment and review.

The procurement office shall file a goods and services contract report quarterly with the fiscal review committee. The report shall list contracts approved in accordance with rules authorized by § 4-56-103 during the prior quarter and detail whether each contract procurement was competitive.

Each procuring agency granted a special delegated authority, pursuant to rules authorized by § 4-56-105, to establish goods and services contracts shall report to the fiscal review committee a list of all contracts awarded under the delegated authority. The list of contracts awarded shall be filed quarterly and shall include the contractor name, contract period, contract amount, method used to select the contractor, and the completion date for a monitoring review, as defined by any applicable policy developed by the chief procurement officer and any other information the procuring agency wishes to include.

The department of transportation shall report to the fiscal review committee on approved highway and road improvement contracts that would otherwise meet the requirements of subdivision (b)(1) within thirty (30) days of approval, including all of the information specified in subsection (a) and any other information the committee deems necessary or helpful. The fiscal review committee shall have the option to conduct a separate hearing on highway and road improvement contracts approved by the department of transportation.

The state building commission shall report to the fiscal review committee on contracts it has approved that would otherwise meet the requirements of subdivision (b)(1) within thirty (30) days of approval, including all of the information specified in subsection (a) and any other information the committee deems necessary or helpful. The committee shall have the option to conduct a separate hearing on contracts approved by the building commission.

Acts 2010, ch. 1098, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 20; 2012, ch. 673, § 2; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 6; T.C.A. §4-56-108.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-56-107 (Acts 2010, ch. 1098, § 1; 2010, ch. 1135, § 12; 2011, ch. 295, § 5), concerning the authority of the comptroller of the treasury to examine procurement contracts, grants and other documents, was repealed by Acts 2013, § 403, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Former §4-56-108 was transferred to this section by Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed former §4-56-107 and transferred former §4-56-108 to this location, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.